Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-205
Aiding consummation of felony; penalty.

(1) A person is guilty of aiding consummation of felony if he intentionally aids another to secrete, disguise, or convert the proceeds of a felony or otherwise profit from a felony.

(2) If the crime involved is a felony of any class, aiding consummation of crime is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 14.

A defendant’s conviction for aiding the consummation of a felony under this section is not incompatible with the defendant’s conviction as a principal of the underlying felony. State v. Hansen, 289 Neb. 478, 855 N.W.2d 777 (2014).

The word “profit” in this section means to make “returns, proceeds, or revenue” on a transaction. State v. Hansen, 289 Neb. 478, 855 N.W.2d 777 (2014).

There is no requirement that the underlying felony referred to in this section be committed in Nebraska. State v. Schiesser, 24 Neb. App. 407, 888 N.W.2d 736 (2016).